Utah statutes.
63G-6-411 (Repealed 05/01/13).   Emergency procurements.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, when there exists a threat to public health, welfare, or safety under emergency conditions as defined in rules and regulations, the chief procurement officer, the head of a purchasing agency, or a designee of either officer may make or authorize others to make emergency procurements; provided that emergency procurements shall be made with as much competition as practicable under the circumstances.  A written determination of the basis for the emergency and for the selection of the particular contractor shall be included in the contract file.

